src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NI-biadh
+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:biadh^M^C     Nom-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:bídh^M^G      Gen-sg-initial;
+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:biadh         Voc-initial;



!**************************************************************************
! Moirfeolaíocht na nAinmfhocail Gaeilge (Morphology of Irish Nouns)
!**************************************************************************
!		PROPER NOUNS
!**************************************************************************
! E. Uí Dhonnchadha 
!  
! April 2003: ^IM general initial mutation flag
!
!!! ADDED THE +SG TAG 20/2/2004
!!! ADDED NP-Fam Aug 2004
!**************************************************************************  
!**************************************************************************  
!				CONTINUATION CLASSES
!**************************************************************************  


LEXICON NP-PLACE
+Prop+Noun+Masc:	SéUrú2;

LEXICON NP-PLACE-EN-fem
+Prop+Noun+Fem:		SéUrú-EN;

LEXICON NP-PLACE-EN
+Prop+Noun+Masc:	SéUrú-EN;

LEXICON NP-PLACE-sg
+Prop+Noun+Masc:	SéUrú;
+Adj+Base+DeNom:^VHach	SéUrú;

LEXICON NP-PLACE-fem
+Prop+Noun+Fem:		SéUrú-fem;
+Adj+Base+DeNom:^VHach	SéUrú;

LEXICON NP-PLACE-pl
+Prop+Noun+Masc:	SéUrú-PL;

LEXICON NP-FAM-EN
+Prop+Noun+Masc:	SéUrú2;

LEXICON NP-PERS-EN-fem
+Prop+Noun+Fem:	SéUrú2;

LEXICON NP-PERS-EN
+Prop+Noun+Masc:	SéUrú2;


LEXICON NP-Fam
+Prop+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:^IM^hv		#;
+Prop+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:^M^G^Caol^hv^ts		#; ! ^Caol not yet tested
+Prop+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg:^IM^Sé		#;
!!!+Prop+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:^M^G^Sé		#;
+Prop+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg+DefArt:^M^C^Lea^tv^VHach		#;

LEXICON NP-Fam-0
+Prop+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:^IM^hv		#;
+Prop+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:^M^G^hv^ts		#;
+Prop+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg:^IM^Sé		#;
+Prop+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg+DefArt:^IM^tv		#;

LEXICON NP-Fam-V
+Prop+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:^IM^hv		#;
+Prop+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:^M^G^hv^ts		#;
+Prop+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg:^IM^Sé		#;
+Prop+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg+DefArt:^IM^tvch	#;

LEXICON NP-Fam-chg
+Prop+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:^IM^hv		#;
+Prop+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:^M^G^hv^ts		#;
+Prop+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg:^IM^Sé		#;
+Prop+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg+DefArt:^Ath^IM^tv	#;

! when it is a place name
! as well as the usual inflections for propernouns  (4 classes)
! we want to generate an adjectival form e.g. Beilg - Beilgeach

! masc nouns - slenderise
LEXICON Nm1-Prop
+Prop+Noun+Masc+Com:^M^C			Sing;
+Prop+Noun+Masc+Gen:^M^G^Caol	IMGen;
+Prop+Noun+Masc+Voc:^M^V^Caol	Seimh;
+Adj+Base+DeNom:^VHach	SéUrú-TIR;

! fem nouns - slenderise and add e
LEXICON Nf2-Prop
+Prop+Noun+Fem+Com:^F^C			Sing;
+Prop+Noun+Fem+Gen:^F^G^Caole	IMGen;
+Prop+Noun+Fem+Voc:^F^V			Seimhiu;
+Adj+Base+DeNom:^VHach	SéUrú-TIR;


! fem nouns - broaden and add a
LEXICON Nf3-Prop
+Prop+Noun+Fem+Com:^F^C			Sing;
+Prop+Noun+Fem+Gen:^F^G^Leaa	IMGen;
+Prop+Noun+Fem+Voc:^F^V		Seimhiu;
+Adj+Base+DeNom:^VHach	SéUrú-TIR;

LEXICON Nm3-Prop
+Prop+Noun+Masc+Com:^M^C			Sing;
+Prop+Noun+Masc+Gen:^M^G^Leaa	IMGen;
+Prop+Noun+Masc+Voc:^M^V		Seimhiu;

 
! fem nouns - no change
LEXICON Nf4-Prop
+Prop+Noun+Fem+Com:^F^C			Sing;
+Prop+Noun+Fem+Gen:^F^G			IMGen;
+Prop+Noun+Fem+Voc:^F^V			Seimhiu;
+Adj+Base+DeNom:^VHach	SéUrú-TIR;


! masc nouns - no change
LEXICON Nm4-Prop
+Prop+Noun+Masc+Com:^M^C			Sing;
+Prop+Noun+Masc+Gen:^M^G		IMGen;
+Prop+Noun+Masc+Voc:^M^V		Seimhiu;
+Adj+Base+DeNom:^VHach	SéUrú-TIR;


LEXICON IMGen
#;
0:^hv^ts			Seimhiu;

LEXICON Seimh
+Len:^Sé		#;

LEXICON Seimhiu
+Len:^IM^Sé		#;

LEXICON Sing
+Sg:0				#;
+Sg+Len:^IM^Sé			#;
+Sg+Ecl:^IM^Urú			#;
+Sg+DefArt:^Sé^tv^ts		#;

LEXICON SéUrú-fem
+Com+Sg:			#; 
+Com+Sg+Len:^IM^Sé		#; 
+Gen+Sg+hPref:^IM^hve		#;  ! muintir na háite
+Gen+Pl+Ecl:^IM^Urú		#;

LEXICON SéUrú2
+Com+Sg:	#; 
+Gen+Sg+Len:^IM^Sé		#; 
+Gen+Pl+Ecl:^IM^Urú		#;

LEXICON SéUrú-EN
+Com+Sg:	#; 
+Com+Sg+Len:^IM^Sé		#; 
+Com+Sg+Ecl:^IM^Urú		#;

LEXICON SéUrú-PL
+Com+Pl:	#; 
+Com+Pl+Len:^IM^Sé		#; 
+Com+Pl+Ecl:^IM^Urú		#;

LEXICON NP-X
+Prop+Noun:	#;

LEXICON SéUrú-TIR
#;
+Len:^IM^Sé		#;
+Ecl:^IM^Urú		#;
+DefArt:^Sé^tv^ts	#;

LEXICON AdjF-Prop
+Adj+Fem+Com+Sg+Len:	#;

LEXICON AdjF-Prop-pl
+Adj+Fem+Com+Pl:	#;

LEXICON AdjM-Prop
+Adj+Masc+Com+Sg:	#;

LEXICON AdjM-Prop-pl
+Adj+Masc+Com+Pl:	#;
